test/tools/fsmbook-examples/BrazilianPortuguese2/BrazilianPortuguese2.xfst.script
define Vowel [ a | e | i | o | u 
              | á | é | í | ó | ú
        | â | ê |     ô
        | ã |         õ
        | à
        |                 ü
        ] ;

define Rule1 [ s -> z || Vowel _ Vowel ];

define Rule2 [ ç -> s ];

define Rule3 [ c h -> %$ ];

define Rule4 [ c -> s || _ [ e | i | é | í | ê ] ];

define Rule5 [ c -> k ];

define Rule6 [ s s -> s ];

define Rule7 [ n h -> N ];

define Rule8 [ l h -> L ];

define Rule9 [ h -> 0 ];

define Rule10 [ r r -> R ];

define Rule11 [ r -> R || .#. _ ];

define Rule12 [ e -> i || _ (s) .#. , .#. p _ r ];

define Rule13 [ o -> u || _ (s) .#. ];

define Rule14 [ d -> J || _ [ i | í ] ];

define Rule15 [ t -> C || _ [ i | í ] ];

define Rule16 [ z -> s || _ .#. ];

read regex Rule1 .o. Rule2 .o. Rule3 .o. Rule4 .o. Rule5 .o. Rule6 .o.
           Rule7 .o. Rule8 .o. Rule9 .o. Rule10 .o. Rule11 .o. Rule12 .o.
           Rule13 .o. Rule14 .o. Rule15 .o. Rule16 ; 

write prolog > BrazilianPortuguese2
